Massachusetts, session 194th, H1118.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all health
insurance plans, as defined by Section 1 of Chapter 6D, shall be required to ensure adequate staff
during evening, weekend, and holiday hours to review and respond to any prior authorization
request within 24 hours of receipt. For the purposes of this section, “prior authorization request”
shall mean a submission by a health care provider, as defined by Section 1 of Chapter 6D, to a
patient’s health insurance plan for approval of a service or benefit deemed necessary by the
patient’s treating health care provider.
of 1